trunk/incubator/comb.da.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="ut"/>
    <sdef n="un"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>

    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="på__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="at__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="jeg__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jeg</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mig__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mig</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="du__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dig__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dig</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="han__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>han</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ham__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ham</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hun__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hun</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hende__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hende</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="den__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vi__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="os__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="I__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>I</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jer__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jer</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="de__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dem__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dem</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="tog__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bold__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ad"><i>ad</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="af"><i>af</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bag"><i>bag</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="efter"><i>efter</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="forbi"><i>forbi</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="før"><i>før</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gennem"><i>gennem</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ifølge"><i>ifølge</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="over"><i>over</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="til"><i>til</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="under"><i>under</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="på"><i>på</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="med"><i>med</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="jeg"><i/><par n="jeg__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mig"><i/><par n="mig__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="du"><i/><par n="du__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dig"><i/><par n="dig__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="han"><i/><par n="han__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ham"><i/><par n="ham__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hun"><i/><par n="hun__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hende"><i/><par n="hende__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="den"><i/><par n="den__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="det"><i/><par n="det__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vi"><i/><par n="vi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="os"><i/><par n="os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="I"><i/><par n="I__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="jer"><i/><par n="jer__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i/><par n="de__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dem"><i/><par n="dem__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="og"><i>og</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="men"><i>men</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="eller"><i>eller</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="fordi"><i>fordi</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="hvis"><i>hvis</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="når"><i>når</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i>da</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bistand"><i>bistand</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bovenbramsejl"><i>bovenbramsejl</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dør"><i>dør</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erhvervsliv"><i>erhvervsliv</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fork"><i>fork</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gennemsyn"><i>gennemsyn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovedbund"><i>hovedbund</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreditkort"><i>kreditkort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="livsløgn"><i>livsløgn</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="policelån"><i>policelån</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portvin"><i>portvin</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sightseeingtur"><i>sightseeingtur</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="signalhorn"><i>signalhorn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søhest"><i>søhest</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spærhjul"><i>spærhjul</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svedekur"><i>svedekur</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tankangreb"><i>tankangreb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troldeskov"><i>troldeskov</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="værneting"><i>værneting</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afskrivningslov"><i>afskrivningslov</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barometerstand"><i>barometerstand</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brandmur"><i>brandmur</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dør"><i>dør</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskekniv"><i>fiskekniv</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gæstgivergård"><i>gæstgivergård</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjulbør"><i>hjulbør</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klimastald"><i>klimastald</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyd"><i>lyd</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ormegård"><i>ormegård</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ris"><i>ris</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skær"><i>skær</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smelteovn"><i>smelteovn</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stationsbetjent"><i>stationsbetjent</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tryllestav"><i>tryllestav</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ansættelsesforhold"><i>ansættelsesforhold</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bikort"><i>bikort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brokbånd"><i>brokbånd</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diskdrev"><i>diskdrev</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enkeltark"><i>enkeltark</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fisk"><i>fisk</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forslag"><i>forslag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grundtrin"><i>grundtrin</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indbydelseskort"><i>indbydelseskort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kølehus"><i>kølehus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lovord"><i>lovord</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="observationstårn"><i>observationstårn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ør"><i>ør</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plast"><i>plast</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sildeglimt"><i>sildeglimt</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spejderkorps"><i>spejderkorps</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tegnsprog"><i>tegnsprog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="værtshus"><i>værtshus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
